Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.481

Member—Dissent—Voting restriction.

A member of a limited liability company who is entitled to vote on or approve the plan of merger and who wishes to assert dissenters' rights must not vote in favor of or approve the plan of merger. A member who does not satisfy the requirements of this section is not entitled to payment for the member's interest in the limited liability company under this article.

[ 2015 c 188 s 92.]